Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.150

Attribution of contributions by controlled entities. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

For purposes of this title:

(1) A contribution by a political committee with funds that have all been contributed by one person who exercises exclusive control over the distribution of the funds of the political committee is a contribution by the controlling person.

(2) Two or more entities are treated as a single entity if one of the two or more entities is a subsidiary, branch, or department of a corporation that is participating in an election campaign or making contributions, or a local unit or branch of a trade association, labor union, or collective bargaining association that is participating in an election campaign or making contributions. All contributions made by a person or political committee whose contribution or expenditure activity is financed, maintained, or controlled by a trade association, labor union, collective bargaining organization, or the local unit of a trade association, labor union, or collective bargaining organization are considered made by the trade association, labor union, collective bargaining organization, or local unit of a trade association, labor union, or collective bargaining organization.

(3) The commission shall adopt rules to carry out this section and is not subject to the time restrictions of RCW 29B.20.030(1).

[ 2024 c 164 s 457; 2010 c 204 s 609; 2005 c 445 s 12; 1993 c 2 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.455, 42.17.660.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective dates—2005 c 445: See note following RCW 29B.30.010.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.